Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1401
Act, how cited.

Sections 85-1401 to 85-1420 shall be known and may be cited as the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education Act.

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 4;

Laws 1999, LB 816, § 10.